output_dics/Compressed_dics/de_DOFUS/de_DOFUS.aff
# this is the affix file of the de_DE Hunspell dictionary
# derived from the igerman98 dictionary
#
# Version: 20161207+frami20170109
#
# Copyright (C) 1998-2016 Björn Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de>
#
# License: GPLv2, GPLv3
# There should be a copy of both of this licenses included
# with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
# versions using the GPL may only include the GPL

SET ISO8859-1
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.'



#SFX F   en    innen        en
#SFX F   en    Innen        en




#SFX H N 2
#SFX H   0       heit       .
#SFX H   0       heiten     .


#SFX K N 2
#SFX K   0       keit       .
#SFX K   0       keiten     .
















# last ...oss rules are for swiss de_CH only - but do not affect de_DE








#SFX Q   0       se        s
#SFX Q   0       sen       s



















# last two ...ss rules only used for swiss de_CH - but de_DE is unaffected



REP 28
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP ß ss
REP ss ß
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP i ie
REP ie i
REP ee e
REP o oh
REP oh o
REP a ah
REP ah a
REP e eh
REP eh e
REP ae ä
REP oe ö
REP ue ü
REP Ae Ä
REP Oe Ö
REP Ue Ü
REP d t
REP t d
REP th t
REP t th
REP r rh
REP ch k
REP k ch
#REP eee ee-E

MAP 7
MAP (ss)ß
MAP (ue)ü
MAP (Ue)Ü
MAP (oe)ö
MAP (Oe)Ö
MAP (ae)ä
MAP (Ae)Ä

# this one will allow "-Eltern" - Hunspell 1.1.5 bug, but CHECKSHARPS obsoletes LANG de_DE
#LANG de_DE
CHECKSHARPS


COMPOUNDBEGIN x
COMPOUNDMIDDLE y
COMPOUNDEND z
FORBIDDENWORD d

# Prefixes are allowed at the beginning of compounds,
# suffixes are allowed at the end of compounds by default:
# (prefix)?(root)+(affix)?
# Affixes with COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG may be inside of compounds.
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG c

ONLYINCOMPOUND o

# my PSEUDOROOT h(elper) flag
NEEDAFFIX h

# forbid uppercase characters at compound word bounds
# BUT I want to take care about it myself ;-)
# CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE
KEEPCASE w

# Affixes  signed  with CIRCUMFIX flag may be on a word when this word also has a prefix with CIRCUMFIX flag and vice versa.
# for decapitalizing nouns with fogemorphemes
CIRCUMFIX f

# this one would make a separate dict entry "Denkmalsschutz" invalidate the
# compound of "Denkmal"+"schutz". We do not want this feature here...
# CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# make not all possible suggestions for typos of Flicken or some rare words
NOSUGGEST n

WORDCHARS üÜß-.'0123456789

# - setting this to 2 decreases performance by 1/10 but is needed for "öl" and "ei"
# - setting this to 1 for handling Fuge-elements with dashes (Arbeits-) dash will 
#   be a special word but - is handled as a affix now
COMPOUNDMIN 2

# this ones are for Duden R36 (old orthography)
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 2  #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ee e #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oo o #oldspell
# also need oo o

# this one needs to be flagable to be used for old orthography
#CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE




# Female forms for compound/Compound words:
# attention: [^e][^n] does also filter out "...er" !




# for Uppercased end-words to prepend - and lowercase: (Tier/EPSm) (EX: Bettbezüge und *-laken*)
# AND
# for lowercased end-words to prepend - and re-uppercase : (tier/EPSozm) (EX: Arbeits*-Tier*)
#PFX m A -a/co A
#PFX m a -/ a


# Decapitalizing: (not used ATM... )
# /co(f) : compound permit, in coumpount only, (decapitalizing with fogemorphemes)
#PFX l Y 29
#PFX l A a/co A
#PFX l Ä ä/co Ä
#PFX l B b/co B
#PFX l C c/co C
#PFX l D d/co D
#PFX l E e/co E
#PFX l F f/co F
#PFX l G g/co G
#PFX l H h/co H
#PFX l I i/co I
#PFX l J j/co J
#PFX l K k/co K
#PFX l L l/co L
#PFX l M m/co M
#PFX l N n/co N
#PFX l O o/co O
#PFX l Ö ö/co Ö
#PFX l P p/co P
#PFX l Q q/co Q
#PFX l R r/co R
#PFX l S s/co S
#PFX l T t/co T
#PFX l U u/co U
#PFX l Ü ü/co Ü
#PFX l V v/co V
#PFX l W w/co W
#PFX l X x/co X
#PFX l Y y/co Y
#PFX l Z z/co Z

# private hunspell flags:
# --x : not for capmain (rare words)

# With "BREAK -" some wrong forms are accepted but that is needed for US-Wirtschaft etc.
# So enabling this is the lesser evil. No perfect solution found so far...
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK .

SFX F Y 35
SFX F   0     nen        in
SFX F   e     in         e
SFX F   e     innen      e
SFX F   0     in         [^i]n
SFX F   0     innen      [^i]n
SFX F   0     in         [^enr]
SFX F   0     innen      [^enr]
SFX F   0     in         [^e]r
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]r
SFX F   0     in         [^r]er
SFX F   0     innen      [^r]er
SFX F   0     in         [^e]rer
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]rer
SFX F   0     in         ierer
SFX F   0     innen      ierer
SFX F   er    in         [^i]erer
SFX F   er    innen      [^i]erer
SFX F   in    In         in
SFX F   in    Innen      in
SFX F   e     In         e
SFX F   e     Innen      e
SFX F   0     In         [^i]n
SFX F   0     Innen      [^i]n
SFX F   0     In         [^en]
SFX F   0     Innen      [^en]
SFX F   0     In         [^e]r
SFX F   0     Innen      [^e]r
SFX F   0     In         [^r]er
SFX F   0     Innen      [^r]er
SFX F   0     In         [^e]rer
SFX F   0     Innen      [^e]rer
SFX F   0     In         ierer
SFX F   0     Innen      ierer
SFX F   er    In         [^i]erer
SFX F   er    Innen      [^i]erer
SFX E Y 1
SFX E   0       e          .
SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0       n          .
SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0       en         .
SFX p Y 26
SFX p   auf     äufe      auf
SFX p   auf     äufen     auf
SFX p   aus     äuser     [hH]aus
SFX p   aus     äusern    [hH]aus
SFX p   arkt    ärkte     [mM]arkt
SFX p   arkt    ärkten    [mM]arkt
SFX p   ang     änge      ang
SFX p   ang     ängen     ang
SFX p   uß      üße       uß
SFX p   uß      üßen      uß
SFX p   oß      öße       oß
SFX p   oß      ößen      oß
SFX p   aum     äume      aum
SFX p   aum     äumen     aum
SFX p   ag      äge       ag
SFX p   ag      ägen      ag
SFX p   ug      üge       ug
SFX p   ug      ügen      ug
SFX p   all     älle      all
SFX p   all     ällen     all
SFX p   ass     ässe      ass
SFX p   ass     ässen     ass
SFX p   uss     üsse      uss
SFX p   uss     üssen     uss
SFX p   oss     össe      oss
SFX p   oss     össen     oss
SFX R Y 3
SFX R   0       er         [^e]
SFX R   0       ern        [^e]
SFX R   0       r          e
SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0       s          .
