output_dics/Compressed_dics/de_DOFUS/de_DOFUS.dic
Aiebibak/S
Alako-Pelz/EPS
Albaffe/NS
Albueranische/NRS
Alptraumstein/ES
Alterophile/RS
Amakna/RS
Amakna-Ratte/NS
Amlooping/S
and/PRS
And/PRS
Angora-Maunzmiez/PS
Ankamianische/NRS
Anomaliefragment/EPS
Aperibarbär/PS
Arach-Hai-Drüse/NS
Arach-Hai-Ei/RS
Arachneennetz/ES
Araknawa-Lilie/NS
Arkal/RS
Astaknyde/NS
Astaknydenbraun/ES
Astralsubstrat/S
Astromagische/NS
Astrub/RS
Astrub-Bier/ES
Astrubian/RS
Astrubianer/FNS
Atomyst/EPS
Atomyst-Stein/ES
Aufmunterungszauber/NS
Axtschmied/ES
Azin/PS
Babymoth/S
Backpfeifenputzer-Auszug/Sp
Bagrutt/ES
Balbarbär/PS
Barbi/RS
Barbärischungrig/EPS
Bartagon/ES
Bauersmaid-Trank/S
Behämmert/RS
Beit/RS
Bek/RS
Berserk/RS
Big/NS
Bimbambusstängel/S
Bish/RS
Bling/EPS
Blob-Amulett/ES
Bloblingsblume/NS
Blutyge/RS
Bobbinumhang/S
Boll/ES
Bombuss/PS
Bonta-Offizier/PS
Bonta-Ratte/NS
Bonta-Soldat/PS
Bonta-Spion/ES
Bonta-Umhang/Sp
Bowissen-Stiefel/NS
Bozsenkabombz/S
Brador/ES
Brigandine/RS
Brigandiner-Automat/PS
Brutapir/ES
Brâk-Agent/PS
Brâk-Patrouille/NS
Brâk-Umhang/Sp
Brâkmar-Milizionär/ES
Brüh/ES
Brüllpelz-Jäger/S
Buhn/ES
Bump/PRS
Bwork/RS
Bwork-Bogenschütze/NS
Bworker-Schutzvorkehrung/PS
Bworkgrün/ES
Bworks/ES
Bworksweina/S
Bürzelfeder/NS
Cania-Gipfel/NS
Chafer-Aktivist/PS
Chafer-Infanterist/PS
Chafer-Lanzenträger/NS
Chaferweiß/ES
Chaferzahn/S
Chimärische/NRS
Chronomorph/EPS
Coquépine/S
Crocodyllträne/NS
Crocopal/ES
Crocuzkianische/NRS
Darumak-Figur/PS
Daschischoungrescht/S
DAU-GAU-Kugel/NS
Daxverine/NS
del/PS
dew/PS
Dihus/S
Dimensionsriss/PS
Dink/ES
Dit/ES
Do'Notzis/S
Dofustator/PS
Drachei/RS
Drachei-Axt/S
Drachenhafte/NS
Dracoladung/PS
Dreißigschwänzige/NS
Dubbel-Brüskierung/S
Dungeonboss-Essenz/PS
Däschel/NS
Ecaflip-Dubbel-Püppchen/S
Ecaflip-Haar/ES
Eise/NRS
eisesgestört/ES
Eisfux-Gebiss/ES
Ektoplasmisch/EPRS
Elementor/S
Eliokalyptische/RS
Elosi/ES
Emote-Schriftrolle/NS
Enterdreck/S
Entschlafwandelnde/NRS
Entzweihau/PS
Enutroffäe/NS
Erläut/RS
escht/ES
Esengnal-Klinge/S
Euwe/NS
Expediton/PS
Fahlkoralle/NS
Faltbare/RS
Farle/NS
Federboah-Stein/PS
Feenlösung/S
Fennex/ES
Feuerfuxe/RS
Feuerfüxe/NS
Feuerwirrk/PS
Flaplelema/S
Flauschfatal/ES
Flipass/Sp
Flipp/PS
Fresssackkapp/PS
Freyliche/RS
Frigostianer/FNS
frigostianische/NRS
Frigostianische/NRS
Frostikan/EPS
Fröstel/NS
Furi/EPS
Fux/ES
Fünftsemester/S
Gargandysche/RS
Garglyphe/NS
Gaunzmiez/PS
Gekritzelte/NRS
Gelederte/NRS
Gena/S
Ghul/EPS
Ghule/NS
Gladiatrool/RS
Gladiatrool-Akrobat/PS
Glaskrachler/NS
Gliglitchhaare/S
Gnaul/ES
Goba/NS
Goblindame/NS
Gobwiderung/S
Gon/ES
Griesgramratt/PS
Griesgräber/FNS
Griesmut/S
Grokokoko-Nuss/Sp
Grünhäutige/NS
Gwichtelige/RS
Gönn/EPRS
Güldengrüne/NRS
Gürtong/S
Hah/NS
Heiiiiiiißer/S
Herumwirbelnde/NRS
heut/ES
Hex/EPRS
Hirt/EPS
Hoxor/S
Hype/RS
Höl/EPS
Ige/NRS
Igelnix/ES
Imal/S
Imp/RS
Ingball/Sp
Insektizidbombe/NS
Izit/S
Jed/EPRS
Kah/NS
Kakao-Tempofus/S
Kamamünze/NS
Kan/NS
Kaniglu-Haar/EPS
Kanimod/S
Kanniball/Sp
kanniballische/NS
Kapriole/NS
Kasuarmelspatz/PS
Kate/RS
Kawotte/NS
Kaza/NS
Kell/ERS
Kido-Feder/NS
Kimiya/S
Kirrger-Ohr/PS
Knallfux/RS
Knoch/EPS
Knusperfelsen/S
Knöchrige/NS
Kokokosnuss/Sp
Korallator/PS
Korriander-Blume/NS
Korrianders/S
Krabbmiral/EPS
Krak/EPS
Krakamore/NS
Krallenhieb/PS
Krat/RS
Kripps/S
Kroma-Piratophoren-Jäger/S
Krosboxx/PS
krosmische/NRS
Krosmische/NRS
Kruausame/NS
Krächz/PRS
Kuhurfürst/PS
Kumiho/S
Kuppel-Lude/NS
Kuri/RS
Kurookin-Stoff/ES
Kwelkeist/RS
Käpt/NS
Küwbiss/EPS
Laizosa/S
Lavageist/RS
Leich/EPS
Lerkstim-Gürtel/S
Les/EPRS
Lich/EPS
Lim/ES
Ling/RS
Lotusblüte/NS
Lughas/S
Madam/ES
Mak/EPS
Malockende/S
Mandrinchenblau/ES
Mani/EPRS
maskerador/EPS
Massag/EPS
Maunsha'Etemmiez/S
Maunzebrot/ES
Maunzwildmiez/PS
Mauschelmagier/NS
Meersveckbrett/RS
Mer/S
Meteorschlag/Sp
Miez/PS
Miezteriöse/RS
Minotororhuf/EPS
Minotot-Hut/S
Muart/S
Muminotoror-Bandage/NS
Müfflott-Stein/ES
Nagate/S
Nas/EPS
Nekrobe/NS
Nekromant/FPS
Nerbig/ES
Neugestorbene/RS
Nom/PS
Noroi/S
Ock/RS
Ogrine/NS
Oliviolettas/S
Orichortransporteur/ES
Ostewei/RS
Ostewverwicklungen/S
Ouginak-Sklave/NS
Pandalianisch/EPRS
Pandalianische/NRS
PANDAWA/NS
pandawa/NS
Pandawushu-Artefakt/EPS
Papier-Tiguar/ES
Paradoxale/NRS
Pekan-Nuss/Sp
Pekareaktion/S
Penn/PRS
Pickosonde/NS
Pieks/PRS
Piepmatz-Ei/RS
Pilsi-Piri/S
Poltergardist/PS
Poniente-Relikte/NS
Posadas/S
Powerschuss/Sp
Prunkumhang/Sp
Psi-Lo-Bein/EPS
Psychin/PS
Pyrofels/S
Quadrelementare/RS
quest/EPRS
Rabling-Kralle/NS
Rabmarac-Witz/EPS
Ramdösige/RS
Ratt/EPRS
Regi/ES
Reptilhafter/S
Rhoarim-Geist/RS
Riktanz-Bogenschütze/NS
Ripp/EPRS
Ritualisten/S
Rob/EPS
rotäugige/RS
Rug/Sp
Runomant/PS
Ryt-Muschel/NS
Räd/RS
Räuels/S
Sacrieur/ES
Saugraue/NRS
Savara-Schulterplatten/S
Scara-Gurt/ES
Scarablätter/NS
Schieb/EPRS
Schlack/ERS
Schleichdi/S
Schlossn/EPS
Schlossne/NS
Schlängelchengift/ES
Schnabelstoß/Sp
Schnitzmagie/RS
Schokoligarch/PS
Schokomant/FPS
Schokomanten-Labore/S
Schwanich/EPS
Schwaniche/NS
Seismik/S
Serpulett/PS
Sidimot/ES
Sidimotiviert/S
Siebmaschine/NS
Skorpiut/EPRS
Smörebröd/S
Speerschmied/EPS
Spielercharaktere/NS
Spinn/EPRS
Spongischild/ES
Sram/S
Srambad/RS
Ster/ENS
Streichler/NS
Streichler-Auszug/Sp
Stringid-Stiefel/S
Ström/EPS
Störenfritz/ES
Suriminikrebs/EPS
Tadas/S
TaiFu/NS
Tanuki-Krug/Sp
Tausendundein/EPRS
Technomagische/NRS
Tellurische/RS
Temperathurg/PS
Temporis-Beschwörungen/S
Terbös/ERS
Terböse/RS
Thermolaktivanzug/Sp
Thomondore/NS
Tint/EPS
Tints/S
Tion/RS
Tjost/PS
Tofustall/Sp
Toxoliathen-Verdauungsflüssigkeit/S
Trauerschleie/RS
Trisul/EPS
Trithune/NS
Troolfies/ES
Troolglodyt/PS
Troolschlag/Sp
Truhoffäen-Teil/EPS
Trunknydum/S
Truter/NS
Ulgrud-Prunkset/S
Unentzifferbare/NRS
ung/RS
Ur-Rabling/ES
Vega/NS
Verflippte/RS
Vermeng/EPS
Vetauran/RS
Vinriktus/S
Wab/ERS
Wabbitkeule/NS
Wahrheitsuchende/RS
Weissnacht/PS
Weißnachtsgeschenk/EPS
Weißnachtsmonster/NS
Wickat/S
Wushu-Essenz/PS
WuWülfe/NS
Wört/RS
Ytudocef/S
Zang/EPS
Zei/RS
Zentororenschädel/NS
Zwölfianer/FNS
zwölfianisch/EPRS
zöne/NS
